South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 25, Title 39 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 39-25-175. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Domestic shrimp" means shrimp caught and landed in waters of a state or waters of the United States; (2) "Food service establishment" means an establishment engaged in the business of selling ready-to-eat food to the public including, but not limited to, a restaurant, cafeteria, food stand, or food truck; and (3) "Foreign imported shrimp" means shrimp imported into the United States. (B) A food service establishment in this State that serves both foreign imported shrimp and domestic shrimp must conspicuously display the following disclaimer on its menu, if any, and on a sign visible to the public at its main entrance: "Some items served at this establishment may contain foreign imported shrimp. Ask for more information." (C) A food service establishment in this State that serves foreign imported shrimp, but does not serve domestic shrimp, must conspicuously display the following disclaimer on its menu, if any, and on a sign visible to the public at its main entrance: "Some items served at this establishment contain foreign imported shrimp. Ask for more information." (D) A food service establishment that violates this section must: (1) for a first offense, be issued a warning by the Department of Agriculture that provides for a period of three days from the issuance of the warning to remedy the violation; and (2) for a second or subsequent offense, be issued a civil fine of no less than one hundred dollars and no more than five thousand dollars by the Department of Agriculture for each day the violation occurs. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect one hundred twenty days after approval by the Governor. /s/Sen. Bennett                                                     /s/Rep. Forrest /s/Sen. Johnson                                                    /s/Rep. Kirby /s/Sen. Sutton                                                       /s/Rep. Erickson On Part of the Senate                                            On Part of the House ----XX----